src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PROP_29HÄÄ !!= * @CODE@ kuu:kuu
!! Gradation: No
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_29HÄÄ-SG ;
 PROP_29HÄÄ-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_29HÄÄ-SG
+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_29KUU/HÄÄ-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_29HÄÄ-PL
+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_29KUU/HÄÄ-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_30MAA
! Gradation: No
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_30MAA-SG ;
 PROP_30MAA-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_30MAA-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_30MAA/TÜÜ-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_30MAA-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_30MAA/TÜÜ-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_30TÜÜ
! Gradation: No
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_30TÜÜ-SG ;
 PROP_30TÜÜ-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_30TÜÜ-SG
+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_30MAA/TÜÜ-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_30TÜÜ-PL
+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_30MAA/TÜÜ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_31MAI
!! Gradation: No
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_31MAI-SG ;
! PROP_31MAI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_31MAI-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_31MAI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_31MAI-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_31MAI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_31TÄI
! Gradation: No
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_31TÄI-SG ;
! PROP_31TÄI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_31TÄI-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_31TÄI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_31TÄI-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_31TÄI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_32VERI !!veri:ver
!:%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_32VERI-SG ;
! PROP_32VERI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_32VERI-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_32VERI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_32VERI-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_32VERI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_33IGÄ !!igä:igä
!! gradation: yes
!:%^Pen%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_33IGÄ-SG ;
! PROP_33IGÄ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_33IGÄ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_33XX/IGÄ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_33IGÄ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_33XX/IGÄ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_34TULI
!:%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_34TULI-SG ;
! PROP_34TULI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_34TULI-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_34TULI/SÜLI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_34TULI-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_34TULI/SÜLI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_35TARÕ
!! tarõ:tar
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_35TARÕ-SG ;
! PROP_35TARÕ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_35TARÕ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_35TARÕ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_35TARÕ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_35TARÕ-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_35NIMI
!! nimi:nim
!:%>e PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_35NIMI-SG ;
! PROP_35NIMI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_35NIMI-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_35LUMI/NIMI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_35NIMI-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_35LUMI/NIMI-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_35PESÄ
!! pesä:pesä
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_35PESÄ-SG ;
 PROP_35PESÄ-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_35PESÄ-SG
+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_35UMA/PESÄ-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_35PESÄ-PL
+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_35UMA/PESÄ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_36HANGʼ !!= @CODE@ hangʼ:hangʼ
!:%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_36HANGʼ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_36HANGʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_36HANGʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_36HANGʼ/SÄRGʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_36HANGʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_36HANGʼ/SÄRGʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_36SÄRGʼ !!= @CODE@ särgʼ:särgʼ
!:%^WGSteme%> PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_36SÄRGʼ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_36SÄRGʼ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_36SÄRGʼ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_36HANGʼ/SÄRGʼ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_36SÄRGʼ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_36HANGʼ/SÄRGʼ-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_36PÄIV !!= @CODE@ päiv:päiv
:%^ÄI2ÄÄ%>ä PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_36PÄIV-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_36PÄIV-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_36PÄIV-SG
+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_36PÄIV-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_36PÄIV-PL
+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_36PÄIV-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_KOGÕR
!! kogõr:kogõr
!! * Yaml: __N-kogwr36__
!! derived from 36särgʼ
!:%^Pen%^VowRM%>õ PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_KOGÕR-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_KOGÕR-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_KOGÕR-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_KOGÕR-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_KOGÕR-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_KOGÕR-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_46SÕBÕR
!!! sõbõr:sõbõr
!!! * Yaml: __N-swbwr36__
!!! derived from 36särgʼ
!:%^Pen%^VowRM%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_46SÕBÕR-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_46SÕBÕR-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_46SÕBÕR-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_46SÕBÕR-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_46SÕBÕR-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_46SÕBÕR-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_37PINI !!= @CODE@ pini:pini
!:%^Pen%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_37PINI-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_37PINI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_37PINI-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_37ÕLI/PINI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_37PINI-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_37ÕLI/PINI-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_38PUNG
!:a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_38PUNG-SG ;
! PROP_38PUNG-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_38PUNG-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_38PUNG-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_38PUNG-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_38PUNG-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_38PULLʼ !!= * @CODE@ pullʼ:pull
:i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_38PULLʼ-SG ;
 PROP_38PULLʼ-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_38PULLʼ-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_38PULLʼ-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_38PULLʼ-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_38PULLʼ-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_38PAPPʼ !!= * @CODE@ pappʼ:papp
:i PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
 PROP_38PAPPʼ-SG ;
 PROP_38PAPPʼ-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_38PAPPʼ-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_38PAPPʼ/REHKʼ-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_38PAPPʼ-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_38PAPPʼ/REHKʼ-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_38HÜTT !!= * @CODE@ hütt:hütt
!:ü PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_38HÜTT-SG ;
! PROP_38HÜTT-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_38HÜTT-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_38HÜTT-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_38HÜTT-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_38HÜTT-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_38KULD
!:%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
! PROP_38KULD-SG ;
! PROP_38KULD-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_38KULD-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_38KULD-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_38KULD-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_38KULD-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_39HÄBÜ !!= * @CODE@ häbü:häbü
!:%^Pen%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_39HÄBÜ-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_39HÄBÜ-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_39HÄBÜ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_39HÄBÜ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_39HÄBÜ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%}     NMN_39HÄBÜ-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_40TALO !!= @CODE@ talo:talo
: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_40TALO-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_40TALO-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_40TALO-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_40TALO/HELÜ-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_40TALO-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_40TALO/HELÜ-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_41KAND !!= @CODE@ kand:kand
!!! * Yaml: __aig, kand__
!:%^WGStem%>o PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_41KAND-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_41KAND-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_41KAND-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_41KAND-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_41KAND-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_41KAND-PL ;

!LEXICON PROP_41AIG !!= @CODE@ aig:aig
!!! * Yaml: __aig, aig__
!:%^WGStem%>o PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_41AIG-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_41AIG-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_41AIG-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_41AIG-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_41AIG-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_41AIG-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_42VARI
!:%^I2ʼ%>o PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_42VARI-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_42VARI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_42VARI-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_42VARI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_42VARI-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_42VARI-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_43KANARIK !!= @CODE@
!:%^WGStem%>u PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_43KANARIK-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_43KANARIK-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_43KANARIK-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_43KANARIK-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_43KANARIK-PL ;


LEXICON PROP_44SÕDA !!= @CODE@ sõda:sõda
:%^Pen%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_44SÕDA-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_44SÕDA-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_44SÕDA-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_44SÕDA-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_44SÕDA-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_44SÕDA-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_45KANA !!= @CODE@ kana:kana
!:%^Pen%^WGStem PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_45KANA-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_45KANA-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_45KANA-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_45KANA/RIHÄ-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_45KANA-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_45KANA/RIHÄ-PL ;



LEXICON PROP_46HAIN !!= @CODE@ hain:hain
!! * Yaml: __N-jalg, N-hain__
:%^WGStem%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_46HAIN-SG ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ PROP_46HAIN-PL ;
LEXICON PROP_46HAIN-SG
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_46HAIN-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_46HAIN-PL
+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_46HAIN-PL ;


!LEXICON PROP_47ASI !!= @CODE@ asi:asi
!:%^I2ʼ%>a PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_47ASI-SG ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_47ASI-PL ;
!LEXICON PROP_47ASI-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_47ASI-SG ;
!LEXICON PROP_47ASI-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%}     NMN_47ASI-PL ;



!LEXICON PROP_2KASUNUQ !!= * @CODE@ kasunuq:kasunu
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_2KASUNUQ-SG  ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_2KASUNUQ-PL  ;

!LEXICON  PROP_2KASUNUQ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_2KASUNUQ/ELÄNÜQ-SG  ;
!LEXICON PROP_2KASUNUQ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{back%} NMN_2KASUNUQ/ELÄNÜQ-PL  ;

!LEXICON PROP_2ELÄNÜQ !!= * @CODE@ elänüq:elänü
!: PROP-PLC-DOWNCASE-SG-GEN ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_2ELÄNÜQ-SG  ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@  PROP_2ELÄNÜQ-PL  ;

!LEXICON  PROP_2ELÄNÜQ-SG
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_2KASUNUQ/ELÄNÜQ-SG  ;
!LEXICON PROP_2ELÄNÜQ-PL
!+N+Prop:%{front%} NMN_2KASUNUQ/ELÄNÜQ-PL  ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
